Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-213
Fugitive; apprehension in another state; duty.

Any such person who shall be apprehended or captured in such other state by an organization, unit or detachment of the forces of this state shall, without unnecessary delay, be surrendered to the military or police forces of the state in which he is taken or to the United States; but such surrender shall not constitute a waiver by this state of its right to extradite or prosecute such person for any crime committed in this state.

Laws 1941, c. 116, § 5, p. 449;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 55-405;

R.S.1943, § 55-213.